Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-2615
Enforcement of act; Attorney General; powers and duties; violation; civil penalty; recovery of damages.

The Attorney General shall enforce the Credit Report Protection Act. For purposes of the act, the Attorney General may issue subpoenas, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, and seek injunctive relief and a monetary award for civil penalties, attorney's fees, and costs. Any person who violates the act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each violation. The Attorney General may also seek and recover actual damages for each consumer or protected consumer injured by a violation of the act.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 15;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 20.